Idaho, session 2025, H0330.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 23-944, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
23-944. EXCEPTIONS FROM RESTRICTION ON ENTERING OR REMAINING. It
shall not be unlawful for, nor shall section 23-943, Idaho Code, be construed
to restrict, any person under the age of twenty-one (21) years from entering
or being:
(1) Upon the premises of any restaurant, as herein defined, or in any
railroad observation or club car or any airplane of a commercial airline,
notwithstanding that such premises may also be licensed for the sale of
liquor by the drink or for the sale of beer for consumption on the premises or
that alcoholic beverages, or beer, or both, are prepared, mixed or dispensed
and served and consumed therein;
(2) In any building, a part or portion of which is used as a place, as
herein defined, provided such place is separated or partitioned from the re-
mainder of said building and access to such place through a doorway or door-
ways or other means of ingress can be controlled to prevent persons under the
ages specified with respect thereto in section 23-943, Idaho Code, from en-
tering therein;
(3) In any baseball park, sports arena, convention center, multi-
purpose arena, plaza, theater that is presenting live performances, or
fairgrounds, notwithstanding that such premises or any portion thereof may
be licensed for the sale of liquor by the drink, wine or beer for consumption
on the premises or that such products are dispensed and served and consumed
therein; provided, that the person under the age of twenty-one (21) years is
attending a lawful activity, show, exhibition, performance or event on the
premises or is required to be present as a condition of his employment. It is
lawful for persons under the age of twenty-one (21) years to enter and remain
in a baseball park, sports arena, convention center, multipurpose arena,
plaza, theater that is presenting live performances, or fairgrounds as long
as the activity, show, exhibition, performance or event is lawful and the
person does not violate section 23-949, Idaho Code;
(4) Upon the premises of any licensed brewery or winery notwithstanding
that such premises or any portion thereof may also be licensed for the sale of
beer or wine for consumption on the premises or that beer or wine is dispensed
and served and consumed therein;


(5) Upon the licensed premises of a wine retailer, wholly owned and op-
erated by a licensed winery that retails exclusively the products of that
winery;
(6) At a location, other than a liquor, beer, or wine licensed premises,
authorized to serve alcoholic beverages under a valid alcohol beverage
catering permit; or
(7) In any movie theater that is allowed to sell beer or wine for con-
sumption on the premises pursuant to a valid license and which movie theater
had a license that was valid and not suspended or revoked on January 1, 2006,
or July 1, 2025, and in any other theater or movie theater built prior to Jan-
uary 1, 1950, and that is located in a building listed on the national regis-
ter of historic places. No films, still pictures, electronic reproductions
or other visual reproductions that are in violation of chapter 41, title 18,
Idaho Code (indecency and obscenity), or are in violation of federal law re-
garding pornography, indecency or obscenity shall be shown or displayed on
the premises. As used in this subsection, "movie theater" means a motion
picture theater that is being utilized solely for exhibition of a motion pic-
ture.
SECTION 2. That Section 23-1010, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
23-1010. LICENSE TO SELL BEER AT RETAIL -- APPLICATION PROCEDURE AND
FORM -- SHOWING OF ELIGIBILITY FOR LICENSE AND DISQUALIFICATIONS. (1) Every
person who shall apply for a state license to sell beer at retail shall ten-
der the license fee to, and file written application for license with, the
director. The application shall be on a form prescribed by the director that
shall require such information concerning the applicant, the premises for
which license is sought and the business to be conducted thereon by the ap-
plicant as the director may deem necessary or advisable, and which shall en-
able the director to determine that the applicant is eligible and has none of
the disqualifications for license, as provided for in this section. If the
applicant is applying for a license solely for a theater that is presenting
live performances as those terms are defined in section 23-1001, Idaho Code,
or a movie theater, as defined in section 23-944, Idaho Code, built prior to
January 1, 1950, and that is located in a building listed on the national reg-
ister of historic places, the application shall so state. Such information
shall include the following:
(a) The name and place of residence of the applicant and length of his
residence within the state of Idaho and, if the applicant is a partner-
ship, the names, places of residence and lengths of residence within the
state of Idaho of each partner and, if the applicant is a corporation or
association, the date and place of incorporation or organization, the
location of its principal place of business in Idaho and the names and
places of residence of its officers, directors or members of its govern-
ing board and of the person who manages or will manage the business of
selling beer at retail;
(b) The particular place for which the license is desired, designating
the same by a street and number, if practicable, or by such other apt de-
scription as definitely locates such place, and the name of the owner of
the premises for which license is sought;


(2) The application shall affirmatively show:
(a) That the applicant is the bona fide owner of the business that will
be engaged in the sale of beer at retail and with respect to which li-
cense is sought;
(b) That the condition of the place or building wherein it is proposed
to sell beer at retail conforms to all laws and rules of the state of
Idaho and to the ordinances of the county and municipality applicable
thereto relating to public health and safety and to the zoning ordi-
nances of the municipality applicable thereto;
(c) That there is no stamp or permit outstanding and in force that
has been issued to any person by the United States government for the
premises for which license to sell beer at retail is sought, which
stamp or permit denotes payment of any special tax imposed by the United
States government on a retail dealer in liquor or wines, unless said
premises are premises for which a retail license for sale of liquor by
the drink, issued under the provisions of chapter 9, title 23, Idaho
Code, is in force and effect;
(d) That the individual applicant, or each partner of a partnership
applicant, or a corporation applicant or an association applicant is
qualified to do business within the state of Idaho;
(e) That the applicant, if an individual, is not less than nineteen (19)
years of age;
(f) That, within three (3) years immediately preceding the date of
filing the application, the applicant has not been convicted of the vio-
lation of any law of the state of Idaho, any other state, or of the United
States regulating, governing or prohibiting the sale, manufacture,
transportation or possession of alcoholic beverages or intoxicating
liquors, or, within said time, suffered the forfeiture of a bond for
failure to appear in answer to charges of any such violation;
(g) That, within five (5) years immediately preceding the date of fil-
ing the application, the applicant has not been convicted of any felony
or paid any fine or completed any sentence of confinement therefor
within said time;
(h) That, within three (3) years next preceding the date of filing
said application, the applicant has not had any license provided for
herein, or any license or permit issued to the applicant pursuant to the
law of this state, or any other state, or of the United States to sell,
manufacture, transport or possess alcoholic beverages or intoxicating
liquors, revoked.
(3) To determine qualification for a license, the director shall also
cause an investigation that shall include a fingerprint-based criminal his-
tory check of the Idaho central criminal history database and the federal bu-
reau of investigation criminal history database. Each person listed as an
applicant on an initial application shall submit a full set of fingerprints
and the fee to cover the cost of the criminal history background check for
such person with the application.
(4) The affirmative showing required with respect to an applicant under
paragraphs (e), (f), (g) and (h) of subsection (2) of this section shall also
be required to be made with respect to each partner of a partnership appli-


cant and to each incumbent officer, director or member of the governing board
of a corporation or association applicant.
(5) The application must be subscribed and sworn to by the individual
applicant, or by a partner of a partnership applicant, or by an officer or
manager of a corporation or association applicant, before a notary public or
other person authorized by law to administer oaths.
(6) If an applicant shall be unable to make any affirmative showing re-
quired in this section or if an application shall contain a false material
statement, knowingly made, the same shall constitute a disqualification for
license and license shall be refused. If license is received on any appli-
cation containing a false material statement, knowingly made, such license
shall be revoked. If at any time during the period for which license is is-
sued, a licensee becomes unable to make the affirmative showings required by
this section, license shall be revoked, or, if disqualification can be re-
moved, the license shall be suspended until the same shall be removed. The
procedure to be followed upon refusal, revocation or suspension of license
as herein provided for shall be in accordance with the procedure set forth in
this act.
(7) All licenses shall expire at 1:00 a.m. on the first day of the re-
newal month, which shall be determined by the director by administrative
rule and shall be subject to annual renewal upon proper application. The
director will determine the renewal month by county based on the number of
current licenses within each county, distributing renewals throughout the
licensing year. The director may adjust the renewal month to accommodate
population increases. Each licensee will be issued a temporary license to
operate until the renewal month has been determined. Thereafter, renewals
will occur annually on their renewal month. Renewal applications for li-
censes accompanied by the required fee must be filed with the director on or
before the first day of the designated renewal month. Any licensee holding
a valid license who fails to file an application for renewal of the current
license on or before the first day of the designated renewal month shall
have a grace period of an additional thirty-one (31) days in which to file an
application for renewal of the license. The licensee shall not be permitted
to sell beer at retail during the thirty-one (31) day extended time period
unless and until the license is renewed.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.